Utah statutes.
7-23-502.   Examination of books, accounts, and records by the department.

(1)  At least annually the department shall, for each premise engaging in the business of cashing checks or the business of deferred deposit lending:

(a)  examine the books, accounts, and records; and

(b)  make investigations to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2)  In accordance with Section 7-1-401, a person examined under Subsection (1) shall pay a fee for the examination conducted under Subsection (1).

